District of Columbia statutes.
34-1520

Conformity with settlement agreements.

Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to require the Commission to modify, set aside, or otherwise adjust the terms of a settlement approved by the Commission in Formal Case No. 945. To the extent the existence of a settlement obviates the need for proceedings or findings as are referred to in this chapter, the Commission may dispense with the proceedings or findings.

History

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 120, 47 DCR 1091